en: Valerian
de: Baldrian
es: Valeriana
fr: Valériane, Valériane officinale
hr: Odoljen
la: Valeriana officinalis
lt: Valerijonas
nl: Echte valeriaan
pl: Kozłek lekarski

en: Verbena family, Vervain family
de: Verbene, Eisenkraut
es: Verbenáceas
fr: Verbénacées
hr: Obitelj verbene
la: Verbenaceae
nl: IJzerhard familie
pl: Werbenowate

en: Lemon verbena, Lemon beebrush
es: Hierba luisa, Cedrón, Verbena de Indias
fr: Verveine odorante, Verveine citronnelle, Verveine du Pérou
hr: Limunska verbena
la: Aloysia triphylla, Aloysia citrodora
nl: Citroenverbena
pl: Lippia trójlistna, miłowonka trójlistna, cukrownica trójlistna, werbena cytrynowa

en: Fresh lemon verbena
es: Hierba luisa fresca
fr: Verveine odorante fraîche
hr: Svježi limun verbena
nl: Verse citroenverbena

en: Ground dried lemon verbena
es: Hierba luisa seca molida
fr: Verveine odorante sèche moulue
hr: Mljevena osušena limunska verbena
nl: Gemalen citroenverbena

en: Vervains, Vervain
es: Verbena, Vervena
fr: Verveine, Verveines
hr: Vrbene
la: Verbena
nl: Verbena
pl: Werbena, Witułka
zh: 马鞭草属

en: Brazilian verbena, Brazilian vervain
es: Verbena brasileña
hr: Brazilska verbena
la: Verbena brasiliensis
nl: Braziliaanse verbena

en: Common vervain, Common verbena
es: Verbena común
fr: Verveine officinale, Verveine sauvage
hr: Obična vrbena
la: Verbena officinalis
nl: IJzerhard
pl: Werbena pospolita

en: White nettle, White dead-nettle
de: Taubnessel
es: Ortiga blanca
fr: Ortie blanche, Lamier blanc
hr: Bijela kopriva
it: Falsa ortica bianca
ja: オドリコソウ
la: Lamium album
nl: Witte dovenetel
pl: Jasnota biała

en: Yarrow, Common yarrow
de: Schafgarbe
es: Milenrama
fr: Achillée millefeuille
hr: Stolisnik
hu: Árvacsalán
ja: セイヨウノコギリソウ
la: Achillea millefolium
nl: Duizendblad
pl: Krwawnik pospolity

en: Instant beverages, Instant hot beverages
ca: Begudes instantànies
de: Heißgetränke zum Aufgießen
es: Bebidas instantáneas, Bebidas para tomar calientes instantáneas
fi: instant-juomat
fr: Boissons instantanées, Boissons chaudes instantanées, boisson chaude instantanée
hr: Instant napitci
hu: Instant italok, Meleg instant italok, Forró instant italok
it: Bevande istantanee
ja: インスタント飲料
lt: Tirpūs gėrimai, tirpūs karšti gėrimai
nl: Oplosdranken, Warme oplosdranken, Warme oplosdrank
pt: Bebidas instantâneas
ru: Быстрорастворимые горячие напитки

en: Fruit juice concentrates, concentrated fruit juices
fr: Concentrés de jus de fruits, jus de fruits concentrés
hu: Gyümölcslé koncentrátumok

en: Apple juice concentrates, concentrated apple juices
de: Apfelsaftkonzentrate, konzentrierter Apfelsaft
es: Concentrados de jugo de manzana, jugos de manzana concentrados
fr: Concentrés de jus de pommes, Jus de pommes concentrés
hr: Koncentrati soka od jabuke
hu: Almalé koncentrátum
nl: Appelsapconcentraten, geconcentreerde appelsappen

en: Lemon juice concentrates, concentrated lemon juices
de: Zitronensaftkonzentrate, konzentrierter Zitronensaft
es: Concentrados de jugo de limón, jugos de limón concentrados
fr: Concentrés de jus de citrons, Jus de citrons concentrés
hr: Koncentrati limunovog soka
hu: Citromlé koncentrátum
nl: Citroensapconcentraten, geconcentreerde citroensappen

en: Lime juice concentrates, concentrated lime juices
de: Limonensaftkonzentrate, konzentrierter Limonensaft
es: Concentrados de jugo de lima, jugos de lima concentrados
fr: Concentrés de jus de citrons verts, Jus de citrons verts concentrés
hr: Koncentrati soka limete
hu: Limelé koncentrátum
nl: Limoensapconcentraten, geconcentreerde limoensappen

en: Dairy substitutes, Dairies substitutes, Dairy alternatives, Dairy analogues
bg: Заместители на млечни продукти
da: Alternativer til mejeriprodukter
fr: Substituts de produits laitiers
hr: Mliječne zamjene
hu: Tejtermékek helyettesítői, Tejtermékhelyettesítők
nl: Zuivelvervangers
pl: Zastępniki nabiału, Substytuty nabiału
pt: Alternativas aos produtos lácteos
sv: Alternativ till mejeriprodukter
zh: 乳制品替代品

en: Mascarpone substitutes
de: Mascarpone-Ersatz
es: Sustitutos del mascarpone
fr: Substituts du mascarpone
hr: Zamjene za mascarpone
hu: Mascarpone helyettesítő
it: Sostituti del mascarpone
nl: Mascarpone-vervangers

en: Ricotta substitutes
de: Ricotta-Ersatz
es: Sustitutos de la ricotta
fr: Substituts de la ricotta
hr: Zamjene za ricottu
hu: Ricotta helyettesítő
it: Sostituti della ricotta
nl: Ricotta-vervangers

en: Creamer, coffee creamers
de: Getränkeweißer, Kaffeeweiße, Kaffeeweisser
hr: Krema za vrhnje
it: Additivi per caffè
nl: Creamers, Creamer, Koffiecreamer

en: Coffee and tea variety packs
de: Kaffee und Tee Mischpackungen
es: Paquetes variados de té e café
fr: Assortiments de cafés et thés
hr: Različita pakiranja kave i čaja
hu: Kávé és tea válogatások
it: Confezioni miste di caffè e tè
nb: Kaffe te flerpakk
nl: Koffie- en thee-assortimenten
pt: Packs variados de café e chá
sv: Kaffe en te blandförpackningar